Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4204
Strategic child welfare priorities for research or policy development.

The Nebraska Children's Commission shall determine three to five strategic child welfare priorities for research or policy development for each biennium to carry out the legislative intent stated in section 43-4201 for child welfare program and service reform in Nebraska. In determining the strategic child welfare priorities, the commission shall consider the findings and recommendations set forth in the annual report of the Foster Care Review Board, the annual report of the Office of Inspector General for Child Welfare, and the federal Child and Family Services Reviews outcomes.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB600, § 6.